District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.01

Dissolution and winding up.

A limited cooperative association shall be dissolved only as provided in this subchapter and, upon dissolution, wind up in accordance with this subchapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720